anl/cwd_vs_crk/cwd_verb_affixes.lexc
LEXICON VerbPrefixes
@U.order.indep@ INDEPENDENT ;
@U.order.cnj@   CONJUNCT ;
                IMPERATIVE ;
                FUTURE_CONDITIONAL ;
@P.frag.FRAG@   VERBSTEMS ;
LEXICON INDEPENDENT
@U.person.NI@:@U.person.NI@nit2%< IND_TENSE ;
@U.person.KI@:@U.person.KI@kit2%< IND_TENSE ;
@U.person.NULL@                   IND_TENSE ;
@P.frag.FRAG@@U.person.NI@:@P.frag.FRAG@@U.person.NI@ni VERB_FRAG ;
@P.frag.FRAG@@U.person.KI@:@P.frag.FRAG@@U.person.KI@ki VERB_FRAG ;
@U.person.NULL@@P.joiner.NULL@PV/ta+:@U.person.NULL@@P.joiner.NULL@ta%^EGLOT%< VERBPREFIXES ;
@U.person.NULL@@P.joiner.hyphen@PV/ta+:@U.person.NULL@@P.joiner.hyphen@ta-%<  VERBPREFIXES ;
@U.person.NULL@@P.frag.FRAG@PV/ta+:@U.person.NULL@@P.frag.FRAG@ta             VERB_FRAG ;
@U.person.NI@@P.joiner.hyphen@PV/oh+:@U.person.NI@@P.joiner.hyphen@nôh-%<      IND_TENSE ;
@U.person.NI@@P.joiner.NULL@PV/oh+:@U.person.NI@@P.joiner.NULL@nôh%<           IND_TENSE ;
@U.person.NI@@P.joiner.hyphen@PV/ohci+:@U.person.NI@@P.joiner.hyphen@nohci-%<  IND_TENSE ;
@U.person.NI@@P.joiner.NULL@PV/ohci+:@U.person.NI@@P.joiner.NULL@nohci%^EGLOT%< IND_TENSE ;
@U.person.NI@@P.frag.FRAG@PV/oh+:@U.person.NI@@P.frag.FRAG@nôh                 VERB_FRAG ;
@U.person.NI@@P.frag.FRAG@PV/ohci+:@U.person.NI@@P.frag.FRAG@nohci             VERB_FRAG ;
@U.person.KI@@P.joiner.hyphen@PV/oh+:@U.person.KI@@P.joiner.hyphen@kôh-%<      IND_TENSE ;
@U.person.KI@@P.joiner.NULL@PV/oh+:@U.person.KI@@P.joiner.NULL@kôh%<           IND_TENSE ;
@U.person.KI@@P.joiner.hyphen@PV/ohci+:@U.person.KI@@P.joiner.hyphen@kohci-%<  IND_TENSE ;
@U.person.KI@@P.joiner.NULL@PV/ohci+:@U.person.KI@@P.joiner.NULL@kohci%^EGLOT%< IND_TENSE ;
@U.person.KI@@P.frag.FRAG@PV/oh+:@U.person.KI@@P.frag.FRAG@kôh                 VERB_FRAG ;
@U.person.KI@@P.frag.FRAG@PV/ohci+:@U.person.KI@@P.frag.FRAG@kohci             VERB_FRAG ;
@U.person.NULL@@P.joiner.hyphen@PV/oh+:@U.person.NULL@@P.joiner.hyphen@ôh-%<      IND_TENSE ;
@U.person.NULL@@P.joiner.NULL@PV/oh+:@U.person.NULL@@P.joiner.NULL@ôh%<           IND_TENSE ;
@U.person.NULL@@P.joiner.hyphen@PV/ohci+:@U.person.NULL@@P.joiner.hyphen@ohci-%<  IND_TENSE ;
@U.person.NULL@@P.joiner.NULL@PV/ohci+:@U.person.NULL@@P.joiner.NULL@ohci%^EGLOT%< IND_TENSE ;
@U.person.NULL@@P.frag.FRAG@PV/oh+:@U.person.NULL@@P.frag.FRAG@ôh                 VERB_FRAG ;
@U.person.NULL@@P.frag.FRAG@PV/ohci+:@U.person.NULL@@P.frag.FRAG@ohci             VERB_FRAG ;
@U.person.NI@@P.joiner.hyphen@PV/kah+:@U.person.NI@@P.joiner.hyphen@nikâh-%<      IND_TENSE ;
@U.person.NI@@P.joiner.NULL@PV/kah+:@U.person.NI@@P.joiner.NULL@nikâh%<           IND_TENSE ;
@U.person.NI@@P.frag.FRAG@PV/kah+:@U.person.NI@@P.frag.FRAG@nikâh                 VERB_FRAG ;
@U.person.KI@@P.joiner.hyphen@PV/kah+:@U.person.KI@@P.joiner.hyphen@kikâh-%<      IND_TENSE ;
@U.person.KI@@P.joiner.NULL@PV/kah+:@U.person.KI@@P.joiner.NULL@kikâh%<           IND_TENSE ;
@U.person.KI@@P.frag.FRAG@PV/kah+:@U.person.KI@@P.frag.FRAG@kikâh                 VERB_FRAG ;
@U.person.NULL@@P.joiner.hyphen@PV/kah+:@U.person.NULL@@P.joiner.hyphen@kâh-%<    IND_TENSE ;
@U.person.NULL@@P.joiner.NULL@PV/kah+:@U.person.NULL@@P.joiner.NULL@kâh%<         IND_TENSE ;
@U.person.NULL@@P.frag.FRAG@PV/kah+:@U.person.NULL@@P.frag.FRAG@kâh               VERB_FRAG ;
@U.person.NI@@P.joiner.hyphen@PV/tah+:@U.person.NI@@P.joiner.hyphen@nitâh-%<      IND_TENSE ;
@U.person.NI@@P.joiner.NULL@PV/tah+:@U.person.NI@@P.joiner.NULL@nitâh%<           IND_TENSE ;
@U.person.NI@@P.frag.FRAG@PV/tah+:@U.person.NI@@P.frag.FRAG@nitâh                 VERB_FRAG ;
@U.person.KI@@P.joiner.hyphen@PV/tah+:@U.person.KI@@P.joiner.hyphen@kitâh-%<      IND_TENSE ;
@U.person.KI@@P.joiner.NULL@PV/tah+:@U.person.KI@@P.joiner.NULL@kitâh%<           IND_TENSE ;
@U.person.KI@@P.frag.FRAG@PV/tah+:@U.person.KI@@P.frag.FRAG@kitâh                 VERB_FRAG ;
@U.person.NULL@@P.joiner.hyphen@PV/tah+:@U.person.NULL@@P.joiner.hyphen@tâh-%<    IND_TENSE ;
@U.person.NULL@@P.joiner.NULL@PV/tah+:@U.person.NULL@@P.joiner.NULL@tâh%<         IND_TENSE ;
@U.person.NULL@@P.frag.FRAG@PV/tah+:@U.person.NULL@@P.frag.FRAG@tâh               VERB_FRAG ;
LEXICON IND_TENSE
0                                               VERBPREFIXES ;
@P.joiner.NULL@PV/ki+:@P.joiner.NULL@kî%^EGLOT%< VERBPREFIXES ;
@P.joiner.hyphen@PV/ki+:@P.joiner.hyphen@kî-%<  VERBPREFIXES ;
@P.frag.FRAG@PV/ki+:@P.frag.FRAG@kî             VERB_FRAG ;
@P.joiner.NULL@PV/ka+:@P.joiner.NULL@ka%^EGLOT%< VERBPREFIXES ;
@P.joiner.hyphen@PV/ka+:@P.joiner.hyphen@ka-%<  VERBPREFIXES ;
@P.frag.FRAG@PV/ka+:@P.frag.FRAG@ka             VERB_FRAG ;
@P.joiner.NULL@PV/wi+:@P.joiner.NULL@wî%^EGLOT%< VERBPREFIXES ;
@P.joiner.hyphen@PV/wi+:@P.joiner.hyphen@wî-%<  VERBPREFIXES ;
@P.frag.FRAG@PV/wi+:@P.frag.FRAG@wî             VERB_FRAG ;
@P.joiner.NULL@PV/ki+PV/wi+:@P.joiner.NULL@kîwî%^EGLOT%< VERBPREFIXES ;
@P.joiner.hyphen@PV/ki+PV/wi+:@P.joiner.hyphen@kî-wî-%<  VERBPREFIXES ;
@P.frag.FRAG@PV/ki+PV/wi+:@P.frag.FRAG@kî-wî             VERB_FRAG ;
@P.joiner.hyphen@PV/ka-ki+:@P.joiner.hyphen@ka-kî-%< VERBPREFIXES ;
@P.joiner.NULL@PV/ka-ki+:@P.joiner.NULL@kakî%^EGLOT%< VERBPREFIXES ;
@P.frag.FRAG@PV/ka-ki+:@P.frag.FRAG@ka-kî            VERB_FRAG ;
@P.frag.FRAG@PV/ka-ki+:@P.frag.FRAG@kakî             VERB_FRAG ;
@P.joiner.hyphen@PV/ta-ki+:@P.joiner.hyphen@ta-kî-%< VERBPREFIXES ;
@P.joiner.NULL@PV/ta-ki+:@P.joiner.NULL@takî%^EGLOT%< VERBPREFIXES ;
@P.frag.FRAG@PV/ta-ki+:@P.frag.FRAG@ta-kî            VERB_FRAG ;
@P.frag.FRAG@PV/ta-ki+:@P.frag.FRAG@takî             VERB_FRAG ;
LEXICON FUTURE_CONDITIONAL
@U.order.FutCon@ VERBPREFIXES ;
LEXICON CONJUNCT
@P.joiner.hyphen@PV/î+:@P.joiner.hyphen@î-%<         CNJ_TENSE ;
@P.joiner.NULL@PV/î+:@P.joiner.NULL@î%^EGLOT%<       CNJ_TENSE ;
@P.joiner.hyphen@PV/â+:@P.joiner.hyphen@â-%<         CNJ_TENSE ;
@P.joiner.NULL@PV/â+:@P.joiner.NULL@â%^EGLOT%<       CNJ_TENSE ;
@P.joiner.hyphen@PV/kaa+:@P.joiner.hyphen@kâ-%<      CNJ_OHCI ;
@P.joiner.NULL@PV/kaa+:@P.joiner.NULL@kâ%^EGLOT%<    CNJ_OHCI ;
@P.joiner.hyphen@PV/ka+:@P.joiner.hyphen@ka-%<       VERBPREFIXES ;
@P.joiner.NULL@PV/ka+:@P.joiner.NULL@ka%^EGLOT%<     VERBPREFIXES ;
@P.joiner.hyphen@PV/ta+:@P.joiner.hyphen@ta-%<       VERBPREFIXES ;
@P.joiner.NULL@PV/ta+:@P.joiner.NULL@ta%^EGLOT%<     VERBPREFIXES ;
@P.joiner.hyphen@PV/ke+:@P.joiner.hyphen@kê-%<       VERBPREFIXES ;
@P.joiner.NULL@PV/ke+:@P.joiner.NULL@kê%^EGLOT%<     VERBPREFIXES ;
@P.joiner.hyphen@PV/kika+:@P.joiner.hyphen@kika-%<   VERBPREFIXES ;
@P.joiner.NULL@PV/kika+:@P.joiner.NULL@kika%^EGLOT%< VERBPREFIXES ;
@P.joiner.hyphen@PV/kita+:@P.joiner.hyphen@kita-%<   VERBPREFIXES ;
@P.joiner.NULL@PV/kita+:@P.joiner.NULL@kita%^EGLOT%< VERBPREFIXES ;
@P.joiner.hyphen@PV/tita+:@P.joiner.hyphen@tita-%<   VERBPREFIXES ;
@P.joiner.NULL@PV/tita+:@P.joiner.NULL@tita%^EGLOT%< VERBPREFIXES ;
@P.joiner.hyphen@PV/ka-ki+:@P.joiner.hyphen@ka-kî-%<  VERBPREFIXES ;
@P.joiner.NULL@PV/ka-ki+:@P.joiner.NULL@kakî%^EGLOT%< VERBPREFIXES ;
@P.joiner.hyphen@PV/ta-ki+:@P.joiner.hyphen@ta-kî-%<  VERBPREFIXES ;
@P.joiner.NULL@PV/ta-ki+:@P.joiner.NULL@takî%^EGLOT%< VERBPREFIXES ;
@P.joiner.hyphen@PV/kiye+:@P.joiner.hyphen@kiyî-%<   VERBPREFIXES ;
@P.joiner.NULL@PV/kiye+:@P.joiner.NULL@kiyê%^EGLOT%< VERBPREFIXES ;
@P.joiner.hyphen@PV/kiyi+:@P.joiner.hyphen@kiyi-%<   VERBPREFIXES ;
@P.joiner.NULL@PV/kiyi+:@P.joiner.NULL@kiyi%^EGLOT%< VERBPREFIXES ;
@P.joiner.hyphen@PV/kici+:@P.joiner.hyphen@kici-%<   VERBPREFIXES ;
@P.joiner.NULL@PV/kici+:@P.joiner.NULL@kici%^EGLOT%< VERBPREFIXES ;
@P.joiner.hyphen@PV/kah+:@P.joiner.hyphen@kâh-%<   CNJ_TENSE ;
@P.joiner.NULL@PV/kah+:@P.joiner.NULL@kâh%^EGLOT%< CNJ_TENSE ;
@P.joiner.hyphen@PV/tah+:@P.joiner.hyphen@tâh-%<   CNJ_TENSE ;
@P.joiner.NULL@PV/tah+:@P.joiner.NULL@tâh%^EGLOT%< CNJ_TENSE ;
@P.frag.FRAG@PV/î+:@P.frag.FRAG@î         VERB_FRAG ;
@P.frag.FRAG@PV/â+:@P.frag.FRAG@â         VERB_FRAG ;
@P.frag.FRAG@PV/ka+:@P.frag.FRAG@ka       VERB_FRAG ;
@P.frag.FRAG@PV/ta+:@P.frag.FRAG@ta       VERB_FRAG ;
@P.frag.FRAG@PV/kaa+:@P.frag.FRAG@kâ      VERB_FRAG ;
@P.frag.FRAG@PV/ke+:@P.frag.FRAG@kê       VERB_FRAG ;
@P.frag.FRAG@PV/kika+:@P.frag.FRAG@kika   VERB_FRAG ;
@P.frag.FRAG@PV/kita+:@P.frag.FRAG@kita   VERB_FRAG ;
@P.frag.FRAG@PV/tita+:@P.frag.FRAG@tita   VERB_FRAG ;
@P.frag.FRAG@PV/ka-ki+:@P.frag.FRAG@ka-kî VERB_FRAG ;
@P.frag.FRAG@PV/ka-ki+:@P.frag.FRAG@kakî  VERB_FRAG ;
@P.frag.FRAG@PV/ta-ki+:@P.frag.FRAG@ta-kî VERB_FRAG ;
@P.frag.FRAG@PV/ta-ki+:@P.frag.FRAG@takî  VERB_FRAG ;
@P.frag.FRAG@PV/kiye+:@P.frag.FRAG@kiyê   VERB_FRAG ;
@P.frag.FRAG@PV/kiyi+:@P.frag.FRAG@kiyi   VERB_FRAG ;
@P.frag.FRAG@PV/kici+:@P.frag.FRAG@kici   VERB_FRAG ;
@P.frag.FRAG@PV/kah+:@P.frag.FRAG@kâh    VERB_FRAG ;
@P.frag.FRAG@PV/tah+:@P.frag.FRAG@tâh    VERB_FRAG ;
@P.frag.FRAG@ CNJ_TENSE ;
@P.cnj.CC@IC+:@P.cnj.CC@ CNJ_TENSE ;
LEXICON CNJ_OHCI
0 CNJ_TENSE ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@PV/ohci+:@U.joiner.hyphen@ohci-%<   CNJ_TENSE ;
@U.joiner.NULL@PV/ohci+:@U.joiner.NULL@ohci%^EGLOT%< CNJ_TENSE ;
@P.frag.FRAG@PV/ohci+:@P.frag.FRAG@ohci              VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@PV/oh+:@U.joiner.hyphen@ôh-%<       CNJ_TENSE ;
@U.joiner.NULL@PV/oh+:@U.joiner.NULL@ôh%<            CNJ_TENSE ;
@P.frag.FRAG@PV/oh+:@P.frag.FRAG@ôh                  VERB_FRAG ;
LEXICON CNJ_TENSE
@R.joiner.hyphen@                                                  VERBPREFIXES ;
@R.joiner.NULL@                                                    VERBPREFIXES ;
@R.cnj.CC@                                                         VERBPREFIXES ;
@R.frag.FRAG@                                                      VERBPREFIXES ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@@D.cnj.CC@PV/ki+:@U.joiner.hyphen@@D.cnj.CC@kî-%<  VERBPREFIXES ;
@U.joiner.NULL@@D.cnj.CC@PV/ki+:@U.joiner.NULL@@D.cnj.CC@kî%^EGLOT%< VERBPREFIXES ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@@D.cnj.CC@PV/wi+:@U.joiner.hyphen@@D.cnj.CC@wî-%<  VERBPREFIXES ;
@U.joiner.NULL@@D.cnj.CC@PV/wi+:@U.joiner.NULL@@D.cnj.CC@wî%^EGLOT%< VERBPREFIXES ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@@D.cnj.CC@PV/ki+PV/wi+:@U.joiner.hyphen@@D.cnj.CC@kî-wî-%<  VERBPREFIXES ;
@U.joiner.NULL@@D.cnj.CC@PV/ki+PV/wi+:@U.joiner.NULL@@D.cnj.CC@kîwî%^EGLOT%<  VERBPREFIXES ;
@D.cnj.CC@@P.frag.FRAG@PV/ki+:@D.cnj.CC@@P.frag.FRAG@kî             VERB_FRAG ;
@D.cnj.CC@@P.frag.FRAG@PV/ka+:@D.cnj.CC@@P.frag.FRAG@ka             VERB_FRAG ;
@D.cnj.CC@@P.frag.FRAG@PV/wi+:@D.cnj.CC@@P.frag.FRAG@wî             VERB_FRAG ;
@D.cnj.CC@@P.frag.FRAG@PV/ki+PV/wi+:@D.cnj.CC@@P.frag.FRAG@kî-wî    VERB_FRAG ;
@D.cnj.CC@@P.frag.FRAG@PV/ki+PV/wi+:@D.cnj.CC@@P.frag.FRAG@kîwî     VERB_FRAG ;
LEXICON IMPERATIVE
@U.order.imp@  VERBPREFIXES ;
LEXICON VERBPREFIXES
@U.wici.NULL@ VERBSTEMS ;
@U.wici.wici@ WICI ;
REDUPLICATION ;
PREVERBS ;
LEXICON REDUPLICATION
RdplW+:d1ay2 REDUPL_BOUND ;
RdplS+:d1âh  REDUPL_BOUND ;
@U.joiner.NULL@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.NULL@d2ay3d1âh      REDUPL_BOUND ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.hyphen@d2ay3-d1âh REDUPL_BOUND ;
@P.frag.FRAG@ REDUPL_FRAG;
